North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4. Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.
§ 135-67.
Assets of Retirement System.

All of the assets of the Retirement System shall be credited according to the purpose for which they are held to one of two funds, namely, the annuity savings fund and the pension accumulation fund.

The annuity savings fund shall be the fund to which all members’ contributions, and regular interest allowances thereon as provided for in G.S. 135-7(b), shall be credited. From this fund shall be paid the accumulated contributions of a member in accordance
with

G.S. 135-62

, or 135-63.

Upon the retirement of a member, his accumulated contributions shall be transferred from the annuity savings fund to the pension accumulation fund. In the event that a retired former member should subsequently again become a member of the Retirement System
as provided for in G.S. 135-60(c) or 135-71, any excess of his accumulated contributions at his date of retirement over the sum of the retirement allowance payments received by him since his date of retirement shall be transferred
from the pension accumulation fund to the annuity savings fund and shall be credited to his individual account in the annuity savings fund.

The pension accumulation fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated contributions by the State and amounts transferred from the annuity savings fund in accordance with subsection (c) above, and to which all income from the invested assets of
the Retirement System shall be credited. From this fund shall be paid retirement allowances and any other benefits provided for under this Article except payments of accumulated contributions as provided in subsection (b) above.

The regular interest allowance on the members’ accumulated contributions provided for in G.S. 135-7(b) shall be transferred each year from the pension accumulation fund to the annuity savings fund.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1.

§ 135-68.
Contributions by the members.

Each member shall contribute by payroll deduction for each pay period for which he receives compensation six percent (6%) of his compensation for such period.

Anything within this Article to the contrary notwithstanding, the State, pursuant to the provisions of section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as amended, shall pick up and pay the contributions which would be payable by the members under
subsection (a) of this section with respect to the services of such members rendered after the effective date of this subsection.The members’ contributions picked up by the State shall be designated for all purposes of the Retirement
System as member contributions, except for the determination of tax upon a distribution from the System. These contributions shall be credited to the annuity savings fund and accumulated within the fund in a member’s account which
shall be separately established for the purpose of accounting for picked-up contributions.Member contributions picked up by the State shall be payable from the same source of funds used for the payment of compensation to a member.
A deduction shall be made from a member’s compensation equal to the amount of his contributions picked up by the State. This deduction, however, shall not reduce a member’s compensation as defined in subdivision (5) of

G.S. 135-53

. Picked up contributions shall be transmitted to the Retirement System monthly for the preceding month by means of a warrant drawn by the State payable to the Retirement System and shall be accompanied by a schedule
of the picked-up contributions on such forms as may be prescribed.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983, c. 469, s. 1.

§ 135-69.
Contributions by the State.

The State shall contribute annually an amount equal to the sum of the “normal contribution” and the “accrued liability contribution.”

The normal contribution for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the normal contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members for such period. The normal contribution rate shall be determined as the percentage represented
by the ratio of (i) the annual normal cost to provide the benefits of the Retirement System, computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees,
in excess of the part thereof provided by the members’ contributions, to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members of the Retirement System.

The accrued liability contribution for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the accrued liability contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members for such period. The accrued liability contribution rate shall be determined
as the percentage represented by the ratio of (i) the level annual contribution necessary to amortize the unfunded accrued liability over a period of 40 years, computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the
basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees, to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members of the Retirement System.

The unfunded accrued liability as of any date shall be determined, in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees, as the excess of (i) the then present value of the benefits
to be provided under the Retirement System in the future over (ii) the sum of the assets of the Retirement System then currently on hand in the annuity savings fund and the pension accumulation fund, plus the then present value
of the stipulated contributions to be made in the future by the members, plus the then present value of the normal contributions expected to be made in the future by the State.

The normal contribution rate and the accrued liability contribution rate shall be determined after each annual valuation of the Retirement System and shall remain in effect until a new valuation is made.

The annual contributions by the State for any year shall be at least sufficient, when combined with the amount held in the pension accumulation fund at the start of the year, to provide the retirement allowances and other benefits payable out of the fund
during the year then current.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1.

§ 135-70.
Transfer of members to another system.

Any member whose membership service is terminated other than by retirement or death and, who, while still a member of this Retirement System becomes a member of either the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the North Carolina Local Governmental
Employees’ Retirement System, may elect to retain his membership in this Retirement System by not withdrawing his accumulated contributions hereunder. Any such member shall retain all the rights, credits and benefits obtaining
to him under this Retirement System at the time of such termination of service while he is a member of such other system and does not withdraw his contributions hereunder.

(a1) The accumulated contributions and creditable service of any member whose service as a member of this Retirement System has been or is terminated other than by retirement or death and who, while still a member of this Retirement System, became or
becomes a member, as defined in

G.S. 135-1(13)

, of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the member, be transferred from this Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’
Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from this Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, there shall be transferred from this Retirement System
to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System the sum of (i) the accumulated contributions of the member credited in the annuity savings fund and (ii) the amount of reserve held in this Retirement System as a result
of previous contributions by the employer on behalf of the transferring member.

Any member who becomes eligible for benefits under more than one system may file application therefor with each retirement system to the end that each retirement system shall pay appropriate benefits without transfer of funds between the systems.

The Board of Trustees shall effect such rules as it may deem necessary to administer the provisions of the preceding subsections of this section and to prevent any duplication of service credits or benefits that might otherwise occur.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 21; 2003-284, s. 30.18(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 30.18(d), effective January 1, 2004, added subsection (a1).

§ 135-70.1.
Transfer of members from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System.

The accumulated contributions, creditable service, and reserves, if any, of a former teacher or employee, as defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

, 135-1(10), and 128-21(10), respectively, or a former member of the General Assembly who is a member of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the
member, be transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. The accumulated
contributions, creditable service, and reserves of any member whose service as a teacher or employee or member of the General Assembly is terminated other than by retirement or death and who becomes a member of the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System may, upon application of the member, be transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System
to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from the Local Governmental Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative
Retirement System, to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, the accumulated contributions of each member credited in the annuity savings fund in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State
Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System shall be transferred and credited to the annuity savings fund in the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees shall effect such rules as it may deem necessary to administer the preceding subsection and to prevent any duplication of service credits or benefits that might otherwise occur.

History.
1999-237, s. 28.24(h); 2003-284, s. 30.18(e); 2005-276, s. 29.30A(h); 2005-345, s. 42.

§ 135-71.
Return to membership of retired former member.

In the event that a retired former member should at any time return to membership service, his retirement allowance shall thereupon cease and he shall be restored as a member of the Retirement System.

Upon his subsequent retirement, he shall be paid a retirement allowance determined as follows:

For a member who earns at least three years’ membership service after restoration to service, the retirement allowance shall be computed on the basis of his compensation and service before and after the period of prior retirement without restrictions;
provided, that if the prior allowance was based on a social security leveling payment option, the allowance shall be adjusted actuarially for the difference between the amount received under the optional payment and what
would have been paid if the retirement allowance had been paid without optional modification.

For a member who does not earn three years’ membership service after restoration to service, the retirement allowance shall be equal to the sum of the retirement allowance to which he would have been entitled had he not been restored to service, without
modification of the election of an optional allowance previously made, and the retirement allowance that results from service earned since being restored to service; provided, that if the prior retirement allowance was
based on a social security leveling payment option, the prior allowance shall be adjusted actuarially for the difference between the amount that would have been paid for each month had the payment not been suspended and
what would have been paid if the retirement allowance had been paid without optional modification.

Subdivision (2) of this section shall apply only to restored members whose initial retirement lasted for more than four calendar months. For restored members whose initial retirement lasted for four or fewer calendar months, subdivision (1) shall apply.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this Chapter, the retirement allowance of a justice or judge shall not be affected by the compensation received as an emergency justice or judge or as a senior business court judge.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 135-70.1

to the contrary, a retired former member and/or beneficiary of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System as defined in

G.S. 135-1(6)

, whose retirement allowance from this System and/or from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System ceases upon a return to membership service under this System, shall be permitted to transfer the accumulated
contributions, creditable service, and reserves, if any, from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System to this System on the same basis as provided for members of other retirement systems under

G.S. 135-70.1

, if the member attains five or more years of total membership service in this System, and completes at least three years of membership service subsequent to the member’s return to membership service.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 22; c. 1106, s. 3; 1987, c. 738, s. 39(b); 2005-276, s. 29.30A(i); 2016-91, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 29.30A(i), effective September 1, 2005, added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2016-91, s. 5, effective July 11, 2016, added “or as a senior business court judge” at the end of subsection (c).

§ 135-72.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-237, s. 28.25, effective July 1, 1999.

§ 135-73.
Termination or partial termination; discontinuance of contributions.

In the event of the termination or partial termination of the Retirement System or in the event of complete discontinuance of contributions under the Retirement System, the rights of all affected members to benefits accrued to the date of such termination,
partial termination, or discontinuance, to the extent funded as of such date, or the amounts credited to the members’ accounts, shall be nonforfeitable and fully vested.

History.
1987, c. 177, s. 1(a), (b).

§ 135-74.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, compensation for any calendar year after 1988 in which employee or employer contributions are made and for which annual compensation is used for computing any benefit under this Article shall
not exceed the higher of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 1989; provided the imposition of the limitation shall
not reduce a member’s benefit below the amount determined as of December 31, 1988.All the provisions in this subsection have been enacted to make clear that the Plan shall not base contributions or Plan benefits on annual compensation
in excess of the limits prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted from time to time, subject to certain federal grandfathering rules.Effective January 1, 1996, the annual compensation of a member
taken into account for determining all benefits provided under this Article shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted pursuant to section 401(a)(17)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations
issued under the Code. However, with respect to a person who became a member of the Retirement System prior to January 1, 1996, the imposition of this limitation on compensation shall not reduce the amount of compensation which
may be taken into account for determining the benefits of that member under this Article below the amount of compensation which would have been recognized under the provisions of this Article in effect on July 1, 1993.Effective
January 1, 2002, the annual compensation of a person, who became a member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 1996, taken into account for determining all benefits accruing under this Article for any plan year after
December 31, 2001, shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount otherwise set by the Internal Revenue Code or determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after
2002.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual benefit payable on behalf of a member shall, if necessary, be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(b) and with respect to calendar years commencing prior to January 1, 2000,
Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate pursuant to Section 415(d) of the Code. If a member is a participant under any qualified defined contributions plan that
is required to be taken into account for the purposes of the limitation contained in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual benefit payable under this Article shall be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(e)
prior to making any reduction under the defined contribution plan provided by the employer. However, with respect to a member who has benefits accrued under this Article but whose benefit had not commenced as of December 31, 1999,
the combined plan limitation contained in Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applied to such member for calendar years commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

On and after September 8, 2009, and for all Plan years to which the minimum distribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code are applicable, with respect to any member who has terminated employment, the Plan shall comply with federal income tax minimum
distribution rules by applying a reasonable and good faith interpretation to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c1) A member who has contributions in this System and is not eligible for a retirement benefit as set forth in

G.S. 135-57

shall be paid his or her contributions in a lump sum as provided in

G.S. 135-62

by April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a judge, district attorney, public defender, the Director of
Indigent Defense Services, or clerk of superior court as provided in

G.S. 135-53

, except by death. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to complete a refund application by the required date, then the requirement that a refund application be completed shall be waived and
the refund shall be paid without a refund application as a single lump-sum payment with applicable required North Carolina and federal income taxes withheld.A member who has contributions in this System and is eligible for
a retirement benefit as set forth in

G.S. 135-57

shall begin to receive a monthly benefit no later than April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a judge,
district attorney, public defender, the Director of Indigent Defense Services, or clerk of superior court as provided in

G.S. 135-53

, except by death. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to complete the retirement process as set forth under Chapter 135 of the General Statutes by such required beginning date, then the
requirement that a retirement application and an election of payment plan form be completed shall be waived and the retirement allowance shall be paid as a single life annuity. The single life annuity shall be calculated and
processed in accordance with

G.S. 135-58

.For purposes of this subsection, a member shall not be considered to have ceased to be a judge, district attorney, public defender, the Director of Indigent Defense Services, or clerk of superior court as provided
in G.S. 135-53 if the member is actively contributing to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. A retirement benefit
or lump-sum refund shall not be paid under this subsection if the member is actively contributing to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Legislative Retirement
System.

This subsection applies to distributions and rollovers from the Plan. The Plan does not have mandatory distributions within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. With respect to distributions from the Plan and notwithstanding
any other provision of the Plan to the contrary that would otherwise limit a distributee’s election under this Article, a distributee (including, after December 31, 2006, a non-spouse beneficiary if that non-spouse beneficiary
elects a direct rollover only to an inherited traditional or Roth IRA as permitted under applicable federal law) may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Plan administrator, to have any portion of an eligible
rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover. As used in this subsection, an “eligible retirement plan” means an individual retirement account described in
Section 408(a) of the Code, an individual retirement annuity described in Section 408(b) of the Code, an annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the Code, on and after January 1, 2009, a Roth IRA, or a qualified trust described
in Section 401(a) of the Code, that accepts the distributee’s eligible rollover distribution. Effective on and after January 1, 2002, an eligible retirement plan also means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the
Code and an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and which agrees to separately
account for amounts transferred into that plan from this Plan. As used in this subsection, a “direct rollover” is a payment by the Plan to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee. Provided, an eligible rollover
distribution is any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except that an eligible rollover distribution shall not include: any distribution that is one of a series of substantially
equal periodic payments (not less frequently than annually) made for the life (or life expectancy) of the distributee or the joint lives (or joint life expectancies) of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary,
or for a specified period of 10 years or more; any distribution to the extent such distribution is required under section 401(a)(9) of the Code; and the portion of any distribution that is not includible in gross income (determined
without regard to the exclusion for net realized appreciation with respect to employer securities). Effective as of January 1, 2002, and notwithstanding the exclusion of any after-tax portion from such a rollover distribution in
the preceding sentence, a portion of a distribution shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions which are not includible in gross income. That portion
may be transferred, pursuant to applicable federal law, to an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or (b) of the Code, to a qualified defined benefit plan, or to a qualified defined contribution
plan described in Section 401(a), 403(a), or 403(b) of the Code that agrees to separately account for amounts so transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of such distribution which is includible in gross income
and the portion of such distribution which is not so includible. The definition of eligible retirement plan shall also apply in the case of a distribution to surviving spouse, or to a spouse or former spouse who is the alternate
payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a court-ordered equitable distribution of marital property, as provided under

G.S. 50-20.1

. Effective on and after January 1, 2007, notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a nonspouse beneficiary of a deceased member may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator
of the Board of Trustees of this Retirement System, to directly roll over any portion of the beneficiary’s distribution from the Retirement System; however, such rollover shall conform with the provisions of section 402(c)(11)
of the Code.

History.
1989, c. 276, s. 4; 1993, c. 531, s. 8; 1995, c. 361, s. 2; 2002-71, s. 8; 2009-66, s. 1(b); 2012-130, s. 4(d); 2015-164, s. 10(c); 2020-48, s. 1.2(c).

§ 135-75.
Deduction for payments allowed.

Any beneficiary who is a member of a domiciled employees’ or retirees’ association that has at least 2,000 members, the majority of whom are active or retired employees of the State or public school employees, may authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction
from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees’ or retirees’ association. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary. A plan of deductions pursuant to
this section shall become void if the employees’ or retirees’ association engages in collective bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative unit.

Any beneficiary eligible for coverage under the State Health Plan may also authorize, in writing, the monthly deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits of a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan for any dependent whom the
beneficiary wishes to cover under the State Health Plan. In the event that the beneficiary’s own State Health Plan coverage is contributory, in whole or in part, the beneficiary may also authorize a designated lump sum to be paid
to the State Health Plan on behalf of the beneficiary. In addition, a beneficiary may similarly authorize the deduction for supplemental voluntary insurance benefits, provided that the deduction is authorized by the Department
of State Treasurer and is payable to a company with which the Department of State Treasurer has or had an exclusive contractual relationship. Any such authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary.

History.
2002-126, s. 6.4(e); 2012-178, s. 4(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-178, s. 4(d), effective July 1, 2012, in the section catchline, deleted “to certain employees’ or retirees’ associations” following “payments”; designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

§ 135-75.1.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies committed while serving as elected government official.

Except as provided in G.S. 135-56(g), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under the federal laws listed in subsection
(b) of this section or the laws of this State listed in subsection (c) of this section if all of the following apply:

The federal or State offense is committed while serving as a justice, judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court.

The conduct on which the federal or State offense is based is directly related to the member’s service as a justice, judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court.

The federal offenses covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of 18 U.S.C. § 201 (Bribery of public officials and witnesses), 18 U.S.C. § 286 (Conspiracy to defraud the Government with respect to claims), 18 U.S.C. § 287 (False, fictitious or fraudulent claims), 18 U.S.C. § 371 (Conspiracy to
commit offense or to defraud United States), 18 U.S.C. § 597 (Expenditures to influence voting), 18 U.S.C. § 599 (Promise of appointment by candidate), 18 U.S.C. § 606 (Intimidation to secure political contributions), 18
U.S.C. § 641 (Public money, property, or records), 18 U.S.C. § 666 (Embezzlement and theft), 18 U.S.C. § 1001 (Statements or entries generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1341 (Frauds and swindles), 18 U.S.C. § 1343 (Fraud by wire, radio,
or television), 18 U.S.C. § 1503 (Influencing or injuring officer or juror generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1951 (Interference with commerce by threats or violence), 18 U.S.C. § 1952 (Interstate and foreign travel or transportation
in aid of racketeering enterprises), 18 U.S.C. § 1956 (Laundering of monetary instruments), 18 U.S.C. § 1962 (Prohibited activities), or section 7201 of the Internal Revenue Code (Attempt to evade or defeat tax).

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The offenses under the laws of this State covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of Article 29, 30, or 30A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes (Relating to bribery, obstructing justice, and secret listening) or

G.S. 14-228

(Buying and selling offices), or Part 1 of Article 14 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes (Code of Legislative Ethics), Article 20 or 22 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes (Relating to absentee ballots,
corrupt practices and other offenses against the elective franchise, and regulating of contributions and expenditures in political campaigns).

Perjury or false information as follows:

Perjury committed under

G.S. 14-209

in falsely denying the commission of an act that constitutes an offense within the purview of an offense listed in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section.

Subornation of perjury committed under

G.S. 14-210

in connection with the false denial of another as specified by subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Perjury under Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

All monies forfeited under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund.

History.
2007-179, s. 4(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Part 1 of Article 21 or Article 22 of Chapter 163A” for “Article
20 or 22 of Chapter 163” in subdivision (c)(1), and substituted “Article 23 of Chapter 163A” for “Article 22A of Chapter 163” in sub-subdivision (c)(2)c.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

§ 135-75.1A.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to employment or holding office.

Except as provided in G.S. 135-56(j), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under federal law or the laws of this
State if all of the following apply:

The offense is committed while the member is in service.

The conduct resulting in the member’s conviction is directly related to the member’s office or employment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 4.3(c), effective June 26, 2020.

If a member or former member whose benefits under the System were forfeited under this section, except for the return of member contributions plus interest, subsequently receives an unconditional pardon of innocence, or the conviction is vacated or set
aside for any reason, then the member or former member may seek a reversal of the benefit forfeiture by presenting sufficient evidence to the State Treasurer. If the State Treasurer determines a reversal of the benefit forfeiture
is appropriate, then all benefits will be restored upon repayment of all accumulated contributions plus interest. Repayment of all accumulated contributions that have been received by the individual under the forfeiture provisions
of this section must be made in a total lump-sum payment with interest compounded annually at a rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of forfeiture to the year of repayment. An individual
receiving a reversal of benefit forfeiture must receive reinstatement of the service credit forfeited.

History.
2012-193, s. 5; 2020-48, s. 4.3(c).

Cross References.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Legislative Retirement System for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 120-4.33

A.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-18.10

A.

§ 135-75.1B.
Prohibition on purchase of forfeited service.

Any member whose retirement benefits have been forfeited under

G.S. 135-75.1

or

G.S. 135-75.1

A is prohibited from subsequently purchasing or repurchasing either those forfeited benefits or any creditable membership service associated with those forfeited benefits and that service may not be used for the purposes
of eligibility for benefits in any retirement system that provides reciprocal benefits.

History.
2018-52, s. 6(c); 2020-48, s. 4.5(c).

§ 135-75.2.
Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance.

A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the person, with the intent to defraud, receives money as a result of cashing, depositing, or receiving a direct deposit of a decedent’s retirement allowance and the person (i) knows that he or she is not
entitled to the decedent’s retirement allowance, (ii) receives the benefit at least two months after the date of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death, and (iii) does not attempt to inform this Retirement System of the retiree’s or
beneficiary’s death.

History.
2011-232, s. 10(c); 2013-288, s. 9(d).

§ 135-76.

Reserved for future codification purposes.